Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201284-1313.02
Retirement
system; transfer eligible rollover distribution; conditions.

The retirement system may transfer any distribution of benefits to a member
which is an eligible rollover distribution as defined in section 84-1312 in
a direct rollover to the deferred compensation plan authorized
under section 84-1504 if the following conditions are met:

(1) The member has an amount of compensation deferred immediately
after the rollover at least equal to
the amount of compensation deferred immediately before the rollover;

(2) The account of the member is valued as of the date of
final account value;

(3) The member is not eligible for additional annual deferrals
in the receiving plan unless the member is performing services for the state;
and

(4) The deferred compensation plan provides for such rollovers.

Laws 2009, LB188, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 47.